New Jersey, session 221, A1208.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. As used in P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Major warehouse facility means any building, room, structure, or facility of at least 100,000 square feet used primarily for the storage of goods intended for sale. Park-and-ride means a parking lot with public or private transit connections that allows commuters to leave their vehicles and transfer to a bus, rail system, or carpool for the remainder of the journey. b.   Pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1993, c.231 (C.27:1A-5.13), the Commissioner of Transportation shall ensure the availability of park-and-ride lots and facilities near major warehouse facilities within the State by undertaking a review of existing park-and-ride lots and facilities and major warehouse facilities.  If, after such review, it is determined that no park-and-ride lot or facility exists, which could relieve commuter traffic on local roads connecting the nearest interstate or major transit hubs to a major warehouse facility, the commissioner shall prioritize the establishment of one or more. c.   No later than two years after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and every two years thereafter, the Commissioner of Transportation shall prepare and submit a report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), that contains the number and location of park-and-ride lots and facilities that are available near each major warehouse facility in the State and information on the establishment of any new park-and-ride lots and facilities near a major warehouse facility during the preceding two years. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.